Hawaii statutes.
§206-42 Conformity with federal law.
In carrying out this chapter the State and the board of land and natural
resources shall cooperate, to the fullest extent consistent with the provisions
of this chapter, with the federal government, and shall respectively take such
action through the adoption of appropriate rules, regulations, administrative
methods and standards, as may be necessary to secure to this State all
advantages available under any federal law or regulation. [L 1961, c 6, §40;
Supp, §98J-40; HRS §206-42]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next